Hawaii statutes.
§326-30 Making or taking of pictures
without permission prohibited. (a) No person shall photograph, film, or
videotape any patient at any facility maintained by the department of health
for the care and treatment of persons with Hansen's disease, without the
written permission of the patient.

(b) Any person violating this section shall be
fined not more than $1,000 per incident. [L 1923, c 78, §§1, 2; RL 1925, §1203;
am L 1925, c 98, §1; am L 1931, c 139, §5; am L 1933, c 118, §1; RL 1935,
§1167; RL 1945, §2430; am L 1949, c 80, §1(5); am L 1951, c 157, §14; RL 1955,
§50-31; HRS §326-30; am L 1969, c 152, §7; am L 1981, c 185, §15; am L 1985, c
250, §13; am L 1992, c 156, §7]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next